Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.781

Risk management—Safety and loss control program.

(1) The office of risk management shall establish a coordinated safety and loss control program to reduce liability exposure, safeguard state assets, and reduce costs associated with state liability and property losses.

(2) State agencies shall provide top management support and commitment to safety and loss control, and develop awareness through education, training, and information sharing.

(3) The office of risk management shall develop and maintain centralized loss history information for the purpose of identifying and analyzing risk exposures. Loss history information shall be privileged and confidential and reported only to appropriate agencies.

(4) The office of risk management shall develop methods of statistically monitoring agency and statewide effectiveness in controlling losses.

(5) The office of risk management will routinely review agency loss control programs as appropriate to suggest improvements, and observe and recognize successful safety policies and procedures.

(6) The office of risk management shall provide direct assistance to smaller state agencies in technical aspects of proper safety and loss control procedures, upon request.

[ 1989 c 419 s 6. Formerly RCW 43.41.350, 43.19.19368.]

NOTES:

Intent—2002 c 332: See note following RCW 43.19.760.

Intent—Effective date—1989 c 419: See notes following RCW 4.92.006.